Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.025

Enterprise services account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The enterprise services account is created in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be used for all activities conducted by the department, except information technology services. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the director of the office of financial management may authorize expenditures from the account for the provision of small agency client services.

[ 2014 c 221 s 915; 2013 c 251 s 2; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 202; 2002 c 332 s 3; 2001 c 292 s 2; 1998 c 105 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 221: See note following RCW 28A.710.260.

Residual balance of funds—Effective date—2013 c 251: See notes following RCW 41.06.280.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Effective date—1998 c 105: "This act takes effect July 1, 1999." [ 1998 c 105 s 18.]